Utah statutes.
63L-5-401.   Burden on exercise of religion as defense.

A person whose free exercise of religion has been substantially burdened in violation of this chapter may assert that violation as a defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding without regard to whether the proceeding is brought in the name of the state or by any other person.

